packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 94 Y 25
SFX 94 0 0 .
SFX 94 0 ño .
SFX 94 0 ño/1,387 .
SFX 94 0 gan .
SFX 94 0 gana .
SFX 94 0 gana/1,370 .
SFX 94 0 gandik .
SFX 94 0 gandi/1,370 .
SFX 94 0 gatik .
SFX 94 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 94 0 k .
SFX 94 0 rekin .
SFX 94 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 94 0 ren .
SFX 94 0 rendako .
SFX 94 0 rentzat .
SFX 94 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 94 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 94 0 ri .
SFX 94 0 rik .
SFX 94 0 taz .
SFX 94 0 tzat .
SFX 94 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 94 0 z .
SFX 94 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 97 Y 20
SFX 97 0 0 .
SFX 97 0 gan .
SFX 97 0 gana .
SFX 97 0 gana/1,370 .
SFX 97 0 gandik .
SFX 97 0 gandi/1,370 .
SFX 97 0 gatik .
SFX 97 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 97 0 k .
SFX 97 0 rekin .
SFX 97 0 reki/1,370 .
SFX 97 0 ren .
SFX 97 0 rendako .
SFX 97 0 rentzat .
SFX 97 0 rentza/1,370 .
SFX 97 0 ren/1,371 .
SFX 97 0 ri .
SFX 97 0 taz .
SFX 97 0 z .
SFX 97 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 96 Y 37
SFX 96 0 0 .
SFX 96 0 ak .
SFX 96 0 daz .
SFX 96 0 ei .
SFX 96 0 ek .
SFX 96 0 ekin .
SFX 96 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 en .
SFX 96 0 endako .
SFX 96 0 entzat .
SFX 96 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 96 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 96 0 ez .
SFX 96 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 gan .
SFX 96 0 gana .
SFX 96 0 gana/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 gandik .
SFX 96 0 gandi/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 gatik .
SFX 96 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 i .
SFX 96 0 ik .
SFX 96 0 oi .
SFX 96 0 ok .
SFX 96 0 okin .
SFX 96 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 on .
SFX 96 0 ontzat .
SFX 96 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 96 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 96 0 otaz .
SFX 96 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 96 0 oz .
SFX 96 0 tzat .
SFX 96 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 238 Y 18
SFX 238 0 0 .
SFX 238 0 ala .
SFX 238 0 alako .
SFX 238 0 alakoan .
SFX 238 0 alarik .
SFX 238 0 ala/1,370 .
SFX 238 0 an .
SFX 238 0 ana .
SFX 238 0 anean .
SFX 238 0 aneko .
SFX 238 0 anerako .
SFX 238 0 anetik .
SFX 238 0 anetz .
SFX 238 0 anez .
SFX 238 0 anik .
SFX 238 0 an/1,412 .
SFX 238 0 ino .
SFX 238 0 ino/1,370 .
SFX 239 Y 7
SFX 239 0 0 .
SFX 239 0 an .
SFX 239 0 ko .
SFX 239 0 koa .
SFX 239 0 koak .
SFX 239 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 239 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 234 Y 33
SFX 234 0 0 .
SFX 234 0 eino .
SFX 234 0 eino/1,370 .
SFX 234 0 ela .
SFX 234 0 elako .
SFX 234 0 elakoan .
SFX 234 0 elarik .
SFX 234 0 ela/1,370 .
SFX 234 0 en .
SFX 234 0 ena .
SFX 234 0 enean .
SFX 234 0 eneko .
SFX 234 0 enerako .
SFX 234 0 enetik .
SFX 234 0 enetz .
SFX 234 0 enez .
SFX 234 0 enik .
SFX 234 0 en/1,412 .
SFX 234 0 la .
SFX 234 0 lako .
SFX 234 0 lakoan .
SFX 234 0 larik .
SFX 234 0 la/1,370 .
SFX 234 0 n .
SFX 234 0 na .
SFX 234 0 nean .
SFX 234 0 neko .
SFX 234 0 nerako .
SFX 234 0 netik .
SFX 234 0 netz .
SFX 234 0 nez .
SFX 234 0 nik .
SFX 234 0 n/1,412 .
SFX 235 Y 60
SFX 235 0 0 .
SFX 235 0 a .
SFX 235 0 ago .
SFX 235 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 235 0 ak .
SFX 235 0 an .
SFX 235 0 arekin .
SFX 235 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 aren .
SFX 235 0 arendako .
SFX 235 0 arentzat .
SFX 235 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 235 0 ari .
SFX 235 0 az .
SFX 235 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 235 0 ean .
SFX 235 0 egi .
SFX 235 0 egi/1,362 .
SFX 235 0 ei .
SFX 235 0 ek .
SFX 235 0 ekin .
SFX 235 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 eko .
SFX 235 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 235 0 en .
SFX 235 0 endako .
SFX 235 0 entzat .
SFX 235 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 en/1,374 .
SFX 235 0 era .
SFX 235 0 eraino .
SFX 235 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 erantz .
SFX 235 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 235 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 erat .
SFX 235 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 235 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 235 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 235 0 etik .
SFX 235 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 ez .
SFX 235 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 235 0 gatik .
SFX 235 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 i .
SFX 235 0 ik .
SFX 235 0 oi .
SFX 235 0 ok .
SFX 235 0 okin .
SFX 235 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 on .
SFX 235 0 ontzat .
SFX 235 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 235 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 235 0 otaz .
SFX 235 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 235 0 oz .
SFX 236 Y 16
SFX 236 0 ko .
SFX 236 0 koa .
SFX 236 0 koak .
SFX 236 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 236 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 236 0 ra .
SFX 236 0 raino .
SFX 236 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 236 0 rantz .
SFX 236 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 236 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 236 0 rat .
SFX 236 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 236 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 236 0 tik .
SFX 236 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 237 Y 48
SFX 237 0 a .
SFX 237 0 ak .
SFX 237 0 arekin .
SFX 237 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 aren .
SFX 237 0 arendako .
SFX 237 0 arentzat .
SFX 237 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 237 0 ari .
SFX 237 0 az .
SFX 237 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 237 0 ean .
SFX 237 0 ei .
SFX 237 0 ek .
SFX 237 0 ekin .
SFX 237 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 eko .
SFX 237 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 237 0 en .
SFX 237 0 endako .
SFX 237 0 entzat .
SFX 237 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 237 0 era .
SFX 237 0 eraino .
SFX 237 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 erantz .
SFX 237 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 237 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 erat .
SFX 237 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 237 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 237 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 237 0 etik .
SFX 237 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 ez .
SFX 237 0 oi .
SFX 237 0 ok .
SFX 237 0 okin .
SFX 237 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 on .
SFX 237 0 ontzat .
SFX 237 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 237 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 237 0 otaz .
SFX 237 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 237 0 oz .
SFX 230 Y 6
SFX 230 0 ela .
SFX 230 0 ela/1,370 .
SFX 230 0 en .
SFX 230 0 enean .
SFX 230 0 enerako .
SFX 230 0 en/1,412 .
SFX 231 Y 17
SFX 231 0 eino .
SFX 231 0 eino/1,370 .
SFX 231 0 ela .
SFX 231 0 elako .
SFX 231 0 elakoan .
SFX 231 0 elarik .
SFX 231 0 ela/1,370 .
SFX 231 0 en .
SFX 231 0 ena .
SFX 231 0 enean .
SFX 231 0 eneko .
SFX 231 0 enerako .
SFX 231 0 enetik .
SFX 231 0 enetz .
SFX 231 0 enez .
SFX 231 0 enik .
SFX 231 0 en/1,412 .
SFX 232 Y 6
SFX 232 0 ala .
SFX 232 0 ala/1,370 .
SFX 232 0 an .
SFX 232 0 anean .
SFX 232 0 anerako .
SFX 232 0 an/1,412 .
SFX 233 Y 3
SFX 233 0 0 .
SFX 233 0 eino .
SFX 233 0 eino/1,370 .
SFX 146 Y 19
SFX 146 0 0 .
SFX 146 0 ko .
SFX 146 0 koa .
SFX 146 0 koak .
SFX 146 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 146 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 146 0 ra .
SFX 146 0 raino .
SFX 146 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 146 0 rantz .
SFX 146 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 146 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 146 0 rarte .
SFX 146 0 rarte/1,370 .
SFX 146 0 rat .
SFX 146 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 146 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 146 0 tik .
SFX 146 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 147 Y 6
SFX 147 0 ago .
SFX 147 0 ago/1,395 .
SFX 147 0 egi .
SFX 147 0 egi/1,395 .
SFX 147 0 en .
SFX 147 0 en/1,396 .
SFX 144 Y 2
SFX 144 0 0 .
SFX 144 0 xe/1,383 .
SFX 145 Y 22
SFX 145 0 0 .
SFX 145 0 an .
SFX 145 0 daino .
SFX 145 0 daino/1,370 .
SFX 145 0 danik .
SFX 145 0 dani/1,370 .
SFX 145 0 ko .
SFX 145 0 koa .
SFX 145 0 koak .
SFX 145 0 koa/1,377 .
SFX 145 0 ko/1,378 .
SFX 145 0 ra .
SFX 145 0 raino .
SFX 145 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 145 0 rantz .
SFX 145 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 145 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 145 0 rat .
SFX 145 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 145 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 145 0 tik .
SFX 145 0 ti/1,370 .
